Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-294.01
Appropriation; temporary transfer; filings required.

Whenever a temporary transfer is approved in accordance with sections 46-290 to 46-294, the applicant shall, within sixty days after the order of approval of the Chief Water Officer, cause copies of the following to be filed with the county clerk or register of deeds of the county in which the land subject to the appropriation prior to the transfer is located: (1) The permit by which the appropriation was established; (2) the agreement by which the temporary transfer is to be effected; and (3) the order of the Chief Water Officer approving the temporary transfer. Whenever renewal of a temporary transfer is approved pursuant to section 46-294.02, the applicant shall, within sixty days after such approval, cause a copy of the order of the Chief Water Officer approving such renewal to be filed with the county clerk or register of deeds of such county. Such documents shall be indexed to the land subject to the appropriation prior to the transfer. The applicant shall file with the Chief Water Officer, within ninety days after the Chief Water Officer's order of approval, proof of filing with the county clerk or register of deeds. Failure to file such proof of filing within such ninety-day time period shall be grounds for the Chief Water Officer to negate any prior approval of the transfer or renewal.

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 21;

Laws 2006, LB 1226, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 115.